Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,314
Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,314 to 81-15,330 shall be known and may be cited as the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 1.